src/fst/stems/nob-propernouns.lexc
!! # Bokmål propernouns

!! This file documents the Bokmål proper nouns stem file [stems/nob-propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-nob/blob/main/src/fst/stems/nob-propernouns.lexc).

LEXICON ProperNoun-nob-nocomp
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ contains some acronyms

AKP PROP-org ;
AMI PROP-org ;
ANC PROP-org ;
ANSI PROP-org ;
AOF PROP-org ;
AP PROP-org ;
AUF PROP-org ;
